District of Columbia statutes.
34-711

Rights, penalties and forfeitures not released; penalties and forfeitures cumulative.

This subtitle shall not have the effect to release or waive any right of action by the United States, or by the District of Columbia, or by any person, for any right, penalty, or forfeiture under any law of the United States or any regulation in force in the District of Columbia; and all penalties and forfeitures accruing under said chapters shall be cumulative, and a suit for any recovery of one shall not be a bar to the recovery of any other penalty.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 994, ch. 150, § 8, par. 93
1981 Ed., § 43-313.
1973 Ed., § 43-913.